Louisiana, session 2026, HB854.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 47:463.73(A) and (G) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
47:463.243 through 463.247 are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§463.73. Special prestige license plates; Louisiana parochial, public, and private
high schools
A.(1) The secretary of the Department of Public Safety and Corrections shall
establish a special prestige license plate for the Louisiana parochial, public, and
private high schools which have a minimum of one hundred applicants for such
plate. The license plate shall be restricted to passenger cars, pickup trucks, vans, and
recreational vehicles. The license plate shall be of a color and design selected by the
respective high school student council subject to the approval of the respective high
school principal, provided that it is in compliance with R.S. 47:463(A)(3).
Page 1 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 854 ENROLLED
(2) The Department of Public Safety and Corrections, office of motor
vehicles, shall create this special prestige license plate when the applicable statutory
provisions are met and the department's electronic vehicle and registration system
is updated to accommodate the creation of the new plates.
* * *
G. The secretary shall establish special prestige license plates for Archbishop
Hannan High School, Jesuit High School, Mount Carmel Academy, the Academy of
the Sacred Heart, Saint Katharine Drexel Preparatory School, Acadiana High School,
Baker High School, East Feliciana High School, Glen Oaks High School, Neville
High School, Carroll High School, Brusly High School, Port Allen High School,
Covington High School, Scotlandville Magnet High School, St. Michael the
Archangel High School, St. Mary's Dominican High School, St. Edmund Catholic
School, St. Paul's School, St. Scholastica Academy, St. Mary's Academy, Huntington
High School, Haynesville Jr./Sr. High School, Lincoln Preparatory School, Green
Oaks Performing Arts Academy, and any other parochial, public, or private
Louisiana high school in accordance with the provisions of this Section as it was
enacted.
* * *
§463.243. Special prestige license plate; Alzheimer's Awareness
A.(1) The secretary of the Department of Public Safety and Corrections shall
establish a special prestige motor vehicle license plate to be known as the
"Alzheimer's Awareness" plate, provided that there is a minimum of one thousand
applicants for such plate. The plate shall be restricted to use on passenger cars,
pickup trucks, recreational vehicles, motorcycles, and vans.
(2) The Department of Public Safety and Corrections, office of motor
vehicles, shall create this special prestige license plate when the applicable statutory
provisions are met and the department's electronic vehicle and registration system
is updated to accommodate the creation of the new plates.
B. The secretary shall work in conjunction with the Alzheimer's Association
Louisiana Chapter to select the color and design of the plate, provided it is in
Page 2 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 854 ENROLLED
compliance with R.S. 47:463(A)(3). The design shall include "Alzheimer's
Awareness" and the official purple Alzheimer's Awareness logo.
C. The special prestige license plate shall be issued, upon application to any
citizen of Louisiana in the same manner as any other motor vehicle license plate.
D. The department shall collect an annual royalty fee of twenty-five dollars
that shall be disbursed in accordance with Subsection E of this Section. This fee
shall be in addition to the standard motor vehicle license tax imposed by Article VII,
Section 5 of the Constitution of Louisiana and a handling fee of three dollars and
fifty cents for each plate to be retained by the department to offset a portion of
administrative costs.
E. The annual royalty fee shall be collected by the department and
forwarded to the Alzheimer's Association Louisiana Chapter as a charitable donation
to the association by the applicant.
F. The secretary shall promulgate and adopt rules and regulations as are
necessary to implement the provisions of this Section.
§463.244. Special prestige license plate; Lupus Awareness
A.(1) The secretary of the Department of Public Safety and Corrections shall
establish a special prestige motor vehicle license plate to be known as the "Lupus
Awareness" plate, provided there is a minimum of one thousand applicants for such
plates. The license plates shall be restricted to use on passenger cars, pick up trucks,
recreational vehicles, and vans.
(2) The Department of Public Safety and Corrections, office of motor
vehicles, shall create this special prestige license plate when the applicable statutory
provisions are met and the department's electronic vehicle and registration system
is updated to accommodate the creation of the new plates.
B. The secretary shall work in conjunction with the R. Tammy Fleming
Lupus Foundation to select the color and design of the plate, provided it is in
compliance with R.S. 47:463(A)(3). The design shall include "Lupus Awareness"
and the official purple butterfly logo.
Page 3 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 854 ENROLLED
C. The special prestige license plate shall be issued, upon application to any
citizen of Louisiana in the same manner as any other motor vehicle license plate.
D. The department shall collect an annual royalty fee of twenty-five dollars
that shall be disbursed in accordance with Subsection E of this Section. This fee
shall be in addition to the standard motor vehicle license tax imposed by Article VII,
Section 5 of the Constitution of Louisiana, and a handling fee of three dollars and
fifty cents for each plate to be retained by the department to offset a portion of
administrative costs.
E. The annual royalty fee shall be collected by the department and
forwarded to the R. Tammy Fleming Lupus Foundation as a charitable donation to
the association by the applicant.
F. The secretary shall adopt rules and regulations as are necessary to
implement the provisions of this Section.
§463.245. Special prestige license plate; Krewe of Sobek
A.(1) The secretary of the Department of Public Safety and Corrections shall
establish a special prestige motor vehicle license plate to be known as the "Krewe
of Sobek" plate, provided there is a minimum of one thousand applicants for such
plates. The license plates shall be restricted to use on passenger cars, pick up trucks,
recreational vehicles, and vans.
(2) The Department of Public Safety and Corrections, office of motor
vehicles, shall create this special prestige license plate when the applicable statutory
provisions are met and the department's electronic vehicle and registration system
is updated to accommodate the creation of the new plates.
B. The secretary shall work in conjunction with the captain of the Krewe of
Sobek to select the color and design of the plate, provided it is in compliance with
R.S. 47:463(A)(3). The design shall include "Krewe of Sobek".
C. The special prestige license plate shall be issued, upon application, to any
member in good standing of the Krewe of Sobek.
Page 4 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 854 ENROLLED
D. The department shall collect an annual royalty fee of twenty-five dollars
that shall be disbursed in accordance with Subsection E of this Section. This fee
shall be in addition to the standard motor vehicle license tax imposed by Article VII,
Section 5 of the Constitution of Louisiana, and a handling fee of three dollars and
fifty cents for each plate to be retained by the department to offset a portion of
administrative costs.
E. The annual royalty fee shall be collected by the department and forwarded
to the Krewe of Sobek. The monies received from the royalty fees shall be used
solely for the activities of the Krewe of Sobek.
F. The secretary shall adopt rules and regulations as are necessary to
implement the provisions of this Section.
§463.246. Special prestige license plate; Mystic Krewe of Imani
A.(1) The secretary of the Department of Public Safety and Corrections shall
establish a special prestige motor vehicle license plate to be known as the "Mystic
Krewe of Imani" plate, provided there is a minimum of one thousand applicants for
such plates. The license plates shall be restricted to use on passenger cars, pick up
trucks, recreational vehicles, and vans.
(2) The Department of Public Safety and Corrections, office of motor
vehicles, shall create this special prestige license plate when the applicable statutory
provisions are met and the department's electronic vehicle and registration system
is updated to accommodate the creation of the new plates.
B. The secretary shall work in conjunction with the captain of the Mystic
Krewe of Imani to select the color and design of the plate, provided it is in
compliance with R.S. 47:463(A)(3). The design shall include "Mystic Krewe of
Imani".
C. The special prestige license plate shall be issued, upon application, to any
member in good standing of the Mystic Krewe of Imani.
D. The department shall collect an annual royalty fee of twenty-five dollars
that shall be disbursed in accordance with Subsection E of this Section. This fee
shall be in addition to the standard motor vehicle license tax imposed by Article VII,
Page 5 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 854 ENROLLED
Section 5 of the Constitution of Louisiana, and a handling fee of three dollars and
fifty cents for each plate to be retained by the department to offset a portion of
administrative costs.
E. The annual royalty fee shall be collected by the department and forwarded
to the Mystic Krewe of Imani. The monies received from the royalty fees shall be
used solely for the activities of the Mystic Krewe of Imani.
F. The secretary shall adopt rules and regulations as are necessary to
implement the provisions of this Section.
§463.247. Special prestige license plate; Krewe of Harambee
A.(1) The secretary of the Department of Public Safety and Corrections shall
establish a special prestige motor vehicle license plate to be known as the "Krewe
of Harambee" plate, provided there is a minimum of one thousand applicants for
such plates. The license plates shall be restricted to use on passenger cars, pick up
trucks, recreational vehicles, and vans.
(2) The Department of Public Safety and Corrections, office of motor
vehicles, shall create this special prestige license plate when the applicable statutory
provisions are met and the department's electronic vehicle and registration system
is updated to accommodate the creation of the new plates.
B. The secretary shall work in conjunction with the captain of the Krewe of
Harambee to select the color and design of the plate, provided it is in compliance
with R.S. 47:463(A)(3). The design shall include "Krewe of Harambee".
C. The special prestige license plate shall be issued, upon application, to any
member in good standing of the Krewe of Harambee.
D. The department shall collect an annual royalty fee of twenty-five dollars
that shall be disbursed in accordance with Subsection E of this Section. This fee
shall be in addition to the standard motor vehicle license tax imposed by Article VII,
Section 5 of the Constitution of Louisiana, and a handling fee of three dollars and
fifty cents for each plate to be retained by the department to offset a portion of
administrative costs.
Page 6 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 854 ENROLLED
E. The annual royalty fee shall be collected by the department and forwarded
to the Krewe of Harambee. The monies received from the royalty fees shall be used
solely for the activities of the Krewe of Harambee.
F. The secretary shall adopt rules and regulations as are necessary to
implement the provisions of this Section.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 7 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.